Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2049.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4005 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For Medicaid managed care plans, the Oklahoma Health Care
Authority shall ensure that the insurers, health plans, and managed
care plans comply with federal and state laws, rules, and
regulations applicable to coverage for mental health or substance
use disorder services.
B. Contracts with Medicaid managed care plans must require
entities to conduct regular parity compliance analysis that contain
the information described in 42 U.S.C., Section 300gg–26(a)(8)(i-v)
for each nonquantitative treatment limitation imposed on mental
health or substance use disorder benefits in any classification of
care.

C. Contracts with Medicaid managed care plans must include
language requiring managed care plans and entities to conduct parity
analysis described in subsection B of this section for a
nonquantitative treatment limitation whenever as-written or in-
operation changes or amendments are made to that nonquantitative
treatment limitation, including prior authorization requirements.
D. State Medicaid programs and Children's Health Insurance
Programs (CHIP) must review and compile the analysis from all
managed care, CHIP, and alternative benefit plans to ensure
compliance and address any noncompliance through a standardized
process to mitigate findings of noncompliance.
E. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall develop a
standardized process for receiving, investigating, substantiating,
and resolving parity complaints.
F. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall make public the
surveys, financial analysis, managed care contract audits, de-
identified substantiated parity complaints, and parity reports
prepared by the managed care entities and plans and the reports they
submit to document parity compliance.
G. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall also make public
any parity analysis, summary, or report submitted to the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services regarding the Oklahoma Medicaid
managed care program within thirty (30) days of the state's
submission of these reports to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2049 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2049 Page 3